Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 3. Meeting and Organization.

Sec. 24.05.090.
Duration of legislature; sessions.

The legislature shall convene at the capital each year on the third Tuesday in January at 1:00 p.m. Each legislature has a duration of two years and consists of a “First Regular Session” that meets in the odd-numbered years, and a “Second Regular Session” that meets in the even-numbered years, and any special session that the governor or legislature calls.

History.

(§ 9 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 91 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 143 SLA 1975; am § 80 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 34 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 8.

Collateral references. —

81A C.J.S., States, § 103 et seq.

Sec. 24.05.100.
Special sessions.

The legislature may hold a special session not exceeding 30 calendar days in length. The special session shall be called in either of the following ways:

The governor may call the legislature into special session by issuing a proclamation. At a special session called by the governor, legislation is limited to the subjects designated by the governor in the proclamation or to the subjects presented by the governor, and to reconsideration of legislation, if any, vetoed following a regular session of that legislature. To enable the legislators to make travel and other arrangements, a proclamation for a special session shall be issued at least 30 days in advance of the convening date stated in the proclamation unless

the proclamation is issued under AS

26.23.020(k)

;

the special session is called to address a disaster; in this subparagraph, “disaster” has the meaning given in AS

26.23.900

;

the proclamation is issued while both houses are in regular or special session; or

the proclamation is issued within one hour after the second house has adjourned from a regular or special session.

The legislature may call itself into special session if two-thirds of the membership responds in the affirmative to a poll conducted by the presiding officer of each house. Each presiding officer may initiate a poll by their joint agreement, and each shall initiate a poll upon the request of 25 percent of the membership of each house, expressed in writing and signed by those members. When two-thirds of the membership to which the legislature is entitled responds in the affirmative, the president of the senate and speaker of the house shall jointly announce the result of the poll and a date for the convening of the special session. If one of the presiding officers is deceased, has resigned, or is incapacitated, the presiding officer of the other house may conduct the poll of the members of both houses.

A special session may be held at any location in the state. If a special session called under (a)(1) of this section is to be convened at a location other than at the capital, the governor shall designate the location in the proclamation. If a special session called under (a)(2) of this section is to be convened at a location other than at the capital, the presiding officers shall agree to and designate the location in the poll conducted of the members of both houses.

History.

(§ 10 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 9.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, § 59

73 Am. Jur. 2d, Statutes, §§ 35-37.

81A C.J.S., States, § 49.

Sec. 24.05.110.
Joint sessions.

The houses of the legislature shall convene in joint session when required or authorized by the constitution and the rules of the legislature.

History.

(§ 11 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Sec. 24.05.120.
Rules.

At the beginning of the first regular session of each legislature, both houses shall adopt uniform rules of procedure for enacting bills into law and adopting resolutions.
The rules in effect at the last regular session of the immediately preceding legislature serve as the temporary rules of the legislature until the adoption of permanent rules.

History.

(§ 12 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 6 ch 100 SLA 1963)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 12.

The Uniform Rules of the Alaska State Legislature may be found in volume 11 of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 24.05.130.
Journal.

Each house shall keep and publish a daily journal of its proceedings.
The journal shall reflect the essential elements of the business transacted and the messages and communications received from the governor and the other house.

History.

(§ 13 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 12.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories, and Dependencies, § 47.

81A C.J.S., States, § 85.

Sec. 24.05.135.
Record of proceedings.

All floor sessions of each house shall be electronically recorded. However, each house may suspend this recording requirement by concurrence of two-thirds of its members when there is an equipment failure or when no recording equipment is available as a result of a natural disaster or other exigency.

The legislature shall provide by uniform joint rule for the recording or reporting of committee session proceedings.

As the tapes, spools, or other recording devices are filled, or as reports are completed, they shall be transferred to the state library for placement in the state archives. Reproductions shall be placed in a centrally located public library in Juneau, Anchorage, and Fairbanks, until one year after adjournment of the legislative session recorded. The division of the Department of Education and Early Development that has responsibility for state libraries, archives, and museums shall supply reproductions of electronic recordings at cost to any person requesting them.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1975; am § 28 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 42 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Sec. 24.05.140.
Quorum.

A majority of the membership of each house constitutes a quorum to do business.
However, a smaller number may adjourn from day to day and may compel the attendance of absent members in the manner, and under the penalties, provided by law or the rules of the legislature.

History.

(§ 14 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 12.

Sec. 24.05.150.
Adjournment.

Neither house may recess or adjourn for longer than three days unless the other concurs. If the two houses cannot agree on the time for adjournment and either house certifies the disagreement to the governor, the governor may adjourn the legislature by issuing an executive order and transmitting a copy of it to the president or secretary of the senate and speaker or chief clerk of the house of representatives.

The legislature shall adjourn from a regular session within 90 consecutive calendar days, including the day the legislature first convenes in that regular session.

History.

(§ 15 ch 157 SLA 1959; § 1, 2006 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 10.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 2, 2006 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1, § 1 of the initiative, adding subsection (b), is to “[take] effect on the first day of the Second Regular Session of the 25th Alaska Legislature.”
Under
article XI, section 6, Constitution of the State of Alaska, “[a]n initiated law becomes effective ninety days after certification” of the election results by the lieutenant governor.
The lieutenant governor certified the results of the 2006 general election on December 5, 2006, thereby giving 2006 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1 an actual effective date of March 5, 2007.
It is possible, however, that § 2, 2006 General Election Ballot Measure No. 1 will be interpreted as an applicability section, in which case subsection (b) will not apply until the first day of the Second Regular Session of the 25th Alaska State Legislature.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, § 45.

81A C.J.S., States, § 107.

Sec. 24.05.160.
Organization of a first regular session; new members.

On the day set for the assembling of the first regular session of a legislature, the lieutenant governor shall call each house to order and direct the calling of roll of its districts and the names of the new members who are certified as being elected from each district. The lieutenant governor shall then direct the administration of the oath of office of each new member. The lieutenant governor shall then call for the nomination of a temporary president or speaker, as appropriate.
Upon the election of the temporary presiding officers, the lieutenant governor shall relinquish the chair, and each house shall proceed to its further organization. If the lieutenant governor is unable to perform the duties imposed by this section, the chief justice of the supreme court shall act in the lieutenant governor’s place.

History.

(§ 18 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1971, “lieutenant governor” was substituted for “secretary of state” to conform to the 1970 constitutional amendment changing the designation of that office.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, States, Territories, and Dependencies, § 57.

81A C.J.S., States, § 94.

Sec. 24.05.170.
Organization of second and special sessions; new members.

On the day set for the assembly of the second regular session or a special session of the legislature, the presiding officer elected at the first regular session shall administer the oath of office to new members and proceed with the business of the house in accordance with the rules of the legislature.

History.

(§ 19 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1963)

Cross references. —

For presiding officers pro tempore, see AS

24.10.020

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

It is impossible for a newly appointed member of the legislature to receive salary until he is sworn in as a member of the legislature pursuant to this section. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.